Oklahoma, session 2025, SB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1150 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Infrastructure Long-


Range Planning Commission to be housed under and staffed by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce.


B. The Commission shall be composed of twelve (12) members as


follows:


1. The Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce, or his or her designee;



Req. No. 1027 Page 1


2. The Director of the Department of Transportation, or his or


her designee;


3. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Broadband Office, or


his or her designee;


4. Two representatives of public utilities, as such term is


defined in Section 151 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to be


appointed by the Governor;


5. One representative of a municipal utility entity, to be


appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;


6. Two representatives of Native American tribes headquartered


in this state, appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives;


7. One county commissioner from Tulsa or Oklahoma County,


appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;


8. One county commissioner from a county with a population less


than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) persons according to the


latest Federal Decennial Census, appointed by the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate;


9. One current or past mayor of a municipality having a


population less than thirty-five thousand (35,000) persons according


to the latest Federal Decennial Census, appointed by the Speaker of


the House of Representatives; and


10. One current or past mayor of a municipality having a


population less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) persons

Req. No. 1027 Page 2


according to the latest Federal Decennial Census, appointed by the


Speaker of the House of Representatives.


C. The initial term of office of the appointed members shall be


as follows:


1. One of each of the members appointed by the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives shall serve a one-year term;


2. One of each of the members appointed by the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives shall serve a two-year term;


3. One of each of the members appointed by the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives shall serve a three-year term; and


4. One of each of the members appointed by the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives shall serve a four-year term.


D. Each member shall hold office until the successor of the


member is appointed and has qualified. The term of office for each


successor shall be for five (5) years. A member of the Commission


may be removed by the appropriate appointing authority for cause. A


member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring before the expiration


of a term of a member separated from the Commission for any cause


shall be appointed for the remainder of the term of the member whose


office has been so vacated.

Req. No. 1027 Page 3


E. Members of the Commission shall receive no salary, but shall


be entitled to travel reimbursement as provided by the State Travel


Reimbursement Act, Section 500.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, from funds available to the appropriate appointing


authority.


F. The Commission shall submit a report not later than November


1, 2026, and every five (5) years thereafter. The report shall


detail economic development trends and the long-term infrastructure


needs for this state, separated by Congressional boundaries,


including, but not limited to, a prospective look at future demands


on roads, bridges, highways, utilities, and water quality and


quantity.


G. The report shall be published on a publicly available


website and transmitted electronically to the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1027 RD 12/30/2024 7:11:15 PM











Req. No. 1027 Page 4